Rhode Island statutes. Title 8 Courts and Civil Procedure — Courts
Chapter 3 Justices of Supreme, Superior, and Family Courts

8-3-1.
Engagement of office — Restriction on practice of law.

Every justice of the supreme court and of the superior court and of the family court shall, before exercising any of the duties of his or her office, subscribe in duplicate and take the following engagement: “I _____________________________________ do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will support the constitution of the United States and the constitution and laws of this state; that I will administer justice without respect to persons, and do equal right to the poor and to the rich; and that I will faithfully and impartially discharge and perform all the duties incumbent on me as _____________________________________ according to the best of my abilities, agreeable to law; so help me God.” (Or, “this affirmation I make and give upon peril of the penalty or perjury.”) One of the engagements shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the court of which the justice is a member and entered upon the record thereof, and the other shall be filed in the office of the secretary of state.

A justice of the supreme court, of the superior court, and of the family court shall devote full time to his or her judicial duties. He or she shall not practice law while holding office nor shall he or she be a partner or associate of any person in the practice of law.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 28; G.L. 1909, ch. 274, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 324, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 497, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-3-1

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 57; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 14.

8-3-2.
Precedence of associate justices.

The associate justices shall have precedence in their respective courts according to the dates of their commissions, or when the commission of two or more of them bear the same date, according to their ages.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 31; G.L. 1909, ch. 274, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 324, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 497, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

8-3-2

.

8-3-3.
Vacancy in office or inability of chief justice of supreme court.

Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of chief justice of the supreme court, or whenever the chief justice shall be unable, by reason of illness or absence, to perform the duties of his or her office, the associate justice of the supreme court having precedence who is present and qualified to act shall perform the duties of the office until the vacancy shall be filled or the inability removed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 32; G.L. 1909, ch. 274, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 324, § 5; P.L. 1932, ch. 1878, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 497, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

8-3-3

.

8-3-4.
Vacancy in office, inability, or absence of presiding justice of superior court.

Whenever there is a vacancy in the office of presiding justice of the superior court, or whenever the presiding justice shall be unable by reason of illness to perform the duties of his office, the associate justice of the superior court having precedence who is present and qualified to act shall perform the duties of the office until the vacancy shall be filled or the inability removed. In the event that the presiding justice determines that his or her absence will prevent him or her from performing the duties of his or her office, he or she shall designate an associate justice to perform the duties during the period of his or her absence.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 32; G.L. 1909, ch. 274, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 324, § 5; P.L. 1932, ch. 1878, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 497, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

8-3-4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 98, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 132, § 1.

8-3-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 30; G.L. 1909, ch. 274, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 324, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 497, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

8-3-5

; Repealed by P.L. 1987, ch. 381, § 2. Section 7 of P.L. 1987, ch. 381 provides that the repeal of this section by that Act shall take effect on the date that Rhode Island Rules of Evidence adopted by the Supreme Court take effect. Those Rules took effect October 1, 1987.

8-3-6.
Justices as conservators of peace — Powers in criminal cases.

The justices of the supreme and superior court shall, by virtue of their office, be severally conservators of the peace throughout the state, and shall severally have the same power in criminal cases throughout the state that district courts have in their respective districts.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 35; G.L. 1909, ch. 274, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 324, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 497, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

8-3-6

.

8-3-7.
Retirement of justices on reduced pay — Assignment as associate justices.

Whenever any person engaged as a judge:

On or before July 2, 1997 has served as a justice of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, or any combination thereof for twenty (20) years, or has so served for ten (10) years and has reached the age of sixty-five (65) years, that justice may retire from active service and thereafter the justice shall receive annually during life a sum equal to three-fourths (3/4) of the annual salary that the justice was receiving at the time of retirement;

Subsequent to July 2, 1997 and prior to January 1, 2009, has served as a justice of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court or any combination thereof, for twenty (20) years, or has so served for ten (10) years and has reached the age of sixty-five (65) years, said justice may retire from active service and thereafter said justice shall receive annually during life a sum equal to three-fourths (3/4) of his or her average highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation;

On or after January 1, 2009, has served as a justice of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court or any combination thereof, for twenty (20) years, or has so served for ten (10) years and has reached the age of sixty-five (65) years, said justice may retire from active service and thereafter said justice shall receive annually during life a sum equal to seventy percent (70%) of his or her average highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation.

On or after July 1, 2009, shall have served as a justice of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, or any of them for twenty (20) years, or has served for ten (10) years, and reached the age of sixty-five (65) years, said justice may retire from regular active service and thereafter said justice shall receive annually during his or her life a sum equal to sixty-five percent (65%) of his or her average highest five (5) consecutive years of compensation.

Whenever a justice or magistrate shall be granted a leave of absence without pay, such absence shall not be credited towards active service time for the purposes of retirement.

Any justice in any of the courts who shall retire in accordance with the provisions of this section or §

36-9-5

may, at his or her own request and at the direction of the chief justice of the supreme court, subject to the retiree’s physical and mental competence, be assigned to perform such services as an associate justice of the superior court, or the family court, or the district court as the presiding justice of the superior court, or the chief judge of the family court, or the district shall prescribe. When so assigned and performing such service, the justice shall have all the powers and authority of an associate justice of the superior court, the family court, or the district court but otherwise shall have no powers nor be authorized to perform any judicial duties. Such a retired justice shall not be counted in the number of judges provided by law for the superior court, the family court, or the district court.

Any justice of the supreme court who shall retire in accordance with the provisions of this section shall at the direction of the chief justice of the supreme court, subject to the retiree’s physical and mental competence, be assigned to perform such services as an associate justice of the supreme court as the chief justice of the supreme court shall prescribe. When so assigned and performing such services, the retiree shall have all the powers and authority of an associate justice of the supreme court, but otherwise he or she shall have no powers nor be authorized to perform any judicial duties relating to the supreme court, except as authorized under §

8-1-1

. Such a retired justice shall not be counted in the number of justices provided by law for the supreme court.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 29; G.L. 1909, ch. 274, § 2; P.L. 1917, ch. 1475, § 2; P.L. 1922, ch. 2229, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 324, § 2; P.L. 1926, ch. 771, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 497, § 2; P.L. 1948, ch. 2084, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3832, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

8-3-7

; P.L. 1959, ch. 2, § 1; P.L. 1970, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 256, § 2; P.L. 1983, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 35, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 5; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 10.

8-3-7.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 93, § 2; P.L. 2005, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 179, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 35, § 2, effective June 26, 2008.

8-3-7.2.
No incremental retirement benefit for temporary service as chief justice, presiding justice or chief judge.

No increment in salary resulting from any rule or regulation providing for an increment in salary for temporary service as chief justice, presiding justice or chief judge shall be construed to add to the annual salary of a judicial officer for purposes of retirement under §

8-3-7

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 93, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 95, § 1.

8-3-8.
Retirement of justices on full pay — Assignment as associate justices.

Whenever any person engaged as a judge:

On or before July 2, 1997 shall have served as a justice of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, or any of them for twenty (20) years and has reached the age of sixty-five (65) years, or has served for fifteen (15) years, and reached the age of seventy (70) years, that justice may retire from regular active service and thereafter the justice shall receive annually during his or her life a sum equal to the annual salary the justice was receiving at the time of his or her retirement;

Subsequent to July 2, 1997 and prior to January 1, 2009, shall have served as a justice of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, or any of them for twenty (20) years and has reached the age of sixty-five (65) years, or has served for fifteen (15) years, and reached the age of seventy (70) years, said justice may retire from regular active service and thereafter said justice shall receive annually during his or her life a sum equal to his or her average highest three (3) consecutive years of compensation.

On or after January 1, 2009, shall have served as a justice of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, or any of them for twenty (20) years and has reached the age of sixty-five (65) years, or has served for fifteen (15) years, and reached the age of seventy (70) years, said justice may retire from regular active service and thereafter said justice shall receive annually during his or her life a sum equal to ninety percent (90%) of his or her average highest three consecutive years of compensation.

On or after July 1, 2009, shall have served as a justice of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, the district court, or any of them for twenty (20) years and has reached the age of sixty-five (65) years, or has served for fifteen (15) years, and reached the age of seventy (70) years, said justice may retire from regular active service and thereafter said justice shall receive annually during his or her life a sum equal to eighty percent (80%) of his or her average highest five (5) consecutive years of compensation.

Whenever a justice or magistrate shall be granted a leave of absence without pay, such absence shall not be credited towards active service time for the purposes of retirement.

Any justice of any of the courts who shall retire in accordance with the provisions of this section shall at the direction of the chief justice of the supreme court, subject to the retiree’s physical and mental competence, be assigned to perform such services as an associate justice of the superior court, or the family court, or the district court as the presiding justice of the superior court, or the chief judge of the family court, or the district court shall prescribe. When so assigned and performing such service, the retiree shall have all the powers and authority of an associate justice of the superior court, the family court, or the district court but otherwise he or she shall have no powers nor be authorized to perform any judicial duties. Such a retired justice shall not be counted in the number of judges provided by law for the superior court, the family court, or the district court.

Any justice of the supreme court who shall retire in accordance with the provisions of this section shall at the direction of the chief justice of the supreme court, subject to the retiree’s physical and mental competence, be assigned to perform such services as an associate justice of the supreme court as the chief justice of the supreme court shall prescribe. When so assigned and performing such services, the retiree shall have all the powers and authority of an associate justice of the supreme court, but otherwise he or she shall have no powers nor be authorized to perform any judicial duties relating to the supreme court, except as authorized under §

8-1-1

. Such a retired justice shall not be counted in the number of justices provided by law for the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1956, ch. 3633, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1956, §

8-3-8

; P.L. 1970, ch. 300, § 1; P.L. 1973, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 639, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 93, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 179, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 35, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 5; P.L. 2012, ch. 415, § 10.

8-3-8.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 93, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 126, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 179, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 35, § 2, effective June 26, 2008.

8-3-8.2.
No incremental retirement benefit for temporary service as chief justice, presiding justice or chief judge.

No increment in salary resulting from any rule or regulation providing for an increment in salary for temporary service as chief justice, presiding justice or chief judge shall be construed to add to the annual salary of a judicial officer for purposes of retirement under §

8-3-8

or

8-3-8.1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 93, § 2; P.L. 2008, ch. 229, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 321, § 1.

8-3-9.
Computation of service time as to former courts.

For purposes of determining eligibility for retirement under §§

8-3-7

and

8-3-8

, the years of service of any person who has served as an associate judge of the juvenile court prior to September 1, 1961, or who has served as a judge or clerk of a district court as constituted prior to September 15, 1969, or a judge of the workers’ compensation court, shall be included as if the service had been on the court to which the person may have been subsequently appointed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 340, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 216, § 2; P.L. 1999, ch. 384, § 2.

8-3-10.
Service after retirement.

Any justice or judge of the supreme court, superior court, family court, or district court who shall retire in accordance with the provisions of §

8-3-7

,

8-3-8

, or

8-3-12

and who shall subsequently be assigned to perform service in accordance with §

8-3-7

or

8-3-8

, when so assigned and performing such service, shall receive in addition to his or her retirement pension the difference in pay and fringe benefits between what he or she was entitled to receive under § 8-3-7, 8-3-8, or

8-3-12

prior to exercising his or her options available under §

8-3-11

and what a judge or justice with comparable state service time is receiving as a justice or judge of the court to which he/she is assigned, or a justice or judge of the court from which he/she retired, whichever is greater.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 19, § 3.

8-3-11.
Allowances to surviving spouses, domestic partners or minor children of deceased justices.

Whenever any justice of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, or the district court who was engaged as a judge prior to January 1, 2009, dies after retirement or during active service while eligible for retirement, or during active service after having served fifteen (15) years or more in office, his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner shall receive annually thereafter, during his or her lifetime and so long as he or she remains unmarried or not in a domestic partnership, an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the annual payment that the justice was receiving by way of salary or retirement pay at the time of his or her death. Whenever a justice of any of the courts shall die without having become eligible to retire either under §

8-3-7

or

8-3-8

and has served seven (7) years or more in office, his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner shall receive annually thereafter, during his or her lifetime and so long as he or she remains unmarried or not in a domestic partnership, one-third (1/3) of the annual salary that the justice was receiving at the time of his or her death. Whenever a justice of the courts shall die without having become eligible to retire either under §

8-3-7

or

8-3-8

and has not served seven (7) years in office, his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner shall receive annually thereafter, during his or her lifetime and so long as he or she remains unmarried or not in a domestic partnership, one-fourth (1/4) of the annual salary that the justice was receiving at the time of his or her death.

Any justice of the courts who is engaged as a judge on or after January 1, 2009, and prior to July 1, 2009 may elect to receive retirement pay that is reduced by an additional ten percent (10%) of the average of the highest three (3) consecutive years annual compensation (i.e., ninety percent (90%) reduced to eighty percent (80%) or seventy percent (70) reduced to sixty percent (60%)), and where such option is exercised by giving the general treasurer notice in writing thereof within ninety (90) days after the date of his or her retirement his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner or minor children shall receive annually one-half (1/2) of his or her retirement pay during his or her lifetime so long as he or she remains unmarried or not in a domestic partnership, or the children are under twenty-one (21) years of age provided, however, for any justice engaged on or after July 1, 2009 but prior to July 1, 2012, the reduction shall be based on the average of the highest five (5) consecutive years annual compensation.

Any justice of the courts who is engaged as a judge on or after July 1, 2012 and who elects to receive a retirement pay that is reduced, shall receive a lesser retirement allowance as determined by actuarial calculation, which shall be payable throughout life with the provision that:

Option 1. Upon the justice’s death, the justice’s lesser retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to such person having an insurable interest in the justice’s life, as the justice shall nominate by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the retirement board at the time of his or her retirement.

Option 2. Upon the justice’s death, one-half (1/2) of the justice’s lesser retirement allowance shall be continued throughout the life of and paid to such person, having an insurable interest in the justice’s life, as the justice shall nominate by written designation duly acknowledged and filed with the retirement board at the time of the beneficiary’s retirement.

For purposes of any election under this section the justice may designate more than one person to receive benefits after his or her death, provided that the designation shall specify the portion of the actuarial equivalent of the justice’s retirement allowance to be paid to each person, and provided further that the aggregate actuarial value of the portions shall not exceed the actuarial equivalent of the justice’s retirement benefit determined in the case of an election under this section as of the date of the justice’s retirement.

A justice selecting more than one person to receive benefits under this section may only select beneficiaries from among his or her children, adopted children, step-children, and/or spouse or domestic partner.

Whenever any justice of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, or the district court who was engaged as a judge on or after January 1, 2009, dies during active service while eligible for retirement, or during active service after having served fifteen (15) years or more in office, his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner shall receive annually thereafter, during his or her lifetime and so long as he or she remains unmarried or not in a domestic partnership, an amount equal to one-half (1/2) of the annual payment that the justice was receiving by way of salary.

Whenever a justice of any of the courts who was engaged as a judge on or after January 1, 2009, shall die without having become eligible to retire either under §

8-3-7

or

8-3-8

and has served seven (7) years or more in office, his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner shall receive annually thereafter, during his or her lifetime and so long as he or she remains unmarried or not in a domestic partnership, one-third (1/3) of the annual salary that the justice was receiving at the time of his or her death.

Whenever a justice of the courts who was engaged as a judge on or after January 1, 2009, shall die without having become eligible to retire either under §

8-3-7

or

8-3-8

and has not served seven (7) years or more in office, his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner shall receive annually thereafter, during his or her lifetime and so long as he or she remains unmarried or not in a domestic partnership, one-fourth (1/4) of the annual salary that the justice was receiving at the time of his or her death.

In the event the deceased justice shall have no surviving spouse or domestic partner, or the surviving spouse or domestic partner should predecease their minor children, then the benefits conferred by this section shall be received in equal shares by the minor children, if any, until each shall attain the age of twenty-one (21) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 300, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 313, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 19, § 5; P.L. 1982, ch. 204, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 76, § 1; P. L. 1990, ch. 30, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 35, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 13; P.L. 2009, ch. 343, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 344, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 15; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 15.

8-3-12.
Retirement of judges with general assembly or office service.

Any person, who has served as a member of the general assembly, as a general officer, and as a justice of the supreme court, the superior court, the family court, or the district court, whose combined service as a member of the general assembly, a justice, and a general officer is twenty (20) years or more and who has retired, resigned, and completed such service prior to January 1, 2014, shall, upon reaching the age of sixty-two (62) years, receive during life a sum equal to three-fourths (3/4) of the highest annual salary that the person was receiving during such service.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 19, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 407, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 38, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 41, § 1.

8-3-13.
Pension for surviving spouses or domestic partners of judges dying prior to May 10, 1974.

Whenever any justice of the superior court, having served as a justice for at least seven (7) years who died prior to May 10, 1974 during active service, his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner shall receive annually thereafter, during his or her lifetime and so long as he or she remains unmarried or not in a domestic partnership, an amount equal to one-third (1/3) of the annual payment that the justice was receiving by way of salary or retirement pay at the time of his or her death.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 1.

8-3-14.
Applicability of §§ 8-3-12 — 8-3-14.

Sections

8-3-12

—

8-3-14

shall be applicable to all justices of the supreme court whose retirement, resignation, or death occurred subsequent to January 1, 1963, and prior to May 10, 1974, and the surviving spouses of such justices so long as they remain unmarried. Any surviving spouses of justices eligible for benefits pursuant to this section shall receive benefits hereunder from the time of application therefor, and until their death or remarriage, and such benefits shall not be paid for any time between the death or resignation of such justice and May 10, 1974.

History of Section.

P.L. 1974, ch. 272, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 76, § 1.

8-3-15.
Cost-of-living allowance.

All justices of the supreme court, superior court, family court, or district court, or their surviving spouses or domestic partners, who retire after January 1, 1970, and who receive a retirement allowance pursuant to the provisions of this title shall, on the first day of January next following the third anniversary date of retirement, receive a cost-of-living retirement adjustment in addition to his or her retirement allowance in an amount equal to three percent (3%) of the original retirement allowance. In each succeeding year thereafter during the month of January, the retirement allowance shall be increased an additional three percent (3%) of the original allowance, not compounded, to be continued during the lifetime of the justice or his or her surviving spouse or domestic partner. For the purpose of such computation, credit shall be given for a full calendar year regardless of the effective date of the retirement allowance.

Any justice who retired prior to January 31, 1977, shall be deemed for the purpose of this section to have retired on January 1, 1977.

For justices not eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, and not eligible upon passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the cost of living adjustment described in subsection (a) above shall only apply to the first thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000) of retirement allowance, indexed annually, and shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or when the retiree reaches age sixty-five (65), whichever is later. The thirty-five thousand dollar ($35,000) limit shall increase annually by the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumer (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less. The first thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000), as indexed, of retirement allowance shall be multiplied by the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year or three percent (3%), whichever is less, on the month following the anniversary date of each succeeding year. For justices eligible to retire as of September 30, 2009, or eligible upon passage of this article, and for their beneficiaries, the provisions of this subsection (c) shall not apply.

This subsection (d) shall be effective for the period July 1, 2012, through June 30, 2015.

Notwithstanding the prior paragraphs of this section, and subject to paragraph (d)(2) below, for all present and former justices, active and retired justices, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability, or death allowance or benefit of any kind, whether provided for or on behalf of justices engaged on or prior to December 31, 1989, as a non-contributory justice or engaged after December 31, 1989, as a contributory justice, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year under this section shall be equal to (A) multiplied by (B) where (A) is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%) (the “subtrahend”) from the Five-Year Average Investment Return of the retirement system determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent (0%), and (B) is equal to the lesser of the justice’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of retirement allowance, such twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) amount to be indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under (d)(1)(A) above. The “Five-Year Average Investment Return” shall mean the average of the investment return of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. Subject to paragraph (d)(2) below, the benefit adjustment provided by this paragraph shall commence upon the third (3rd) anniversary of the date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age, whichever is later. In the event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.

Except as provided in paragraph (d)(3), the benefit adjustments under this section for any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the Funded Ratio of the Employees’ Retirement System of Rhode Island, the Judicial Retirement Benefits Trust, and the State Police Retirement Benefits Trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all justices for such plan year.

In determining whether a funding level under this paragraph (d)(2) has been achieved, the actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.

Notwithstanding paragraph (d)(2), in each fifth plan year commencing after June 30, 2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2017, and subsequently at intervals of five (5) plan years, a benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with paragraph (d)(1) above until the Funded Ratio of the Employees’ Retirement System of Rhode Island, the Judicial Retirement Benefits Trust, and the State Police Retirement Benefits Trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the provisions of this paragraph (d) of §

8-3-15

shall become effective July 1, 2012, and shall apply to any benefit adjustment not granted on or prior to June 30, 2012.

This subsection (e) shall become effective July 1, 2015.

As soon as administratively reasonable following the enactment into law of this subsection (e), a one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided to justices and/or beneficiaries of justices who retired on or before June 30, 2012, in the amount of two percent (2%) of the lesser of either the justice’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) of the justice’s retirement allowance. This one-time benefit adjustment shall be provided without regard to the retiree’s age or number of years since retirement.

Notwithstanding the prior subsections of this section, for all present and former justices, active and retired justices, and beneficiaries receiving any retirement, disability or death allowance or benefit of any kind, whether provided for or on behalf of justices engaged on or prior to December 31, 1989, as a non-contributory justice or engaged after December 31, 1989, as a contributory justice, the annual benefit adjustment provided in any calendar year under this section for adjustments on and after January 1, 2016, and subject to subsection (e)(2) below, shall be equal to (I) multiplied by (II):

Shall equal the sum of fifty percent (50%) of (i) plus fifty percent (50%) of (ii) where:

Is equal to the percentage determined by subtracting five and one-half percent (5.5%) (the “subtrahend”) from the five-year average investment return of the retirement system determined as of the last day of the plan year preceding the calendar year in which the adjustment is granted, said percentage not to exceed four percent (4%) and not to be less than zero percent (0%). The “five-year average investment return” shall mean the average of the investment returns of the most recent five (5) plan years as determined by the retirement board. In the event the retirement board adjusts the actuarially assumed rate of return for the system, either upward or downward, the subtrahend shall be adjusted either upward or downward in the same amount.

Is equal to the lesser of three percent (3%) or the percentage increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the U.S. Department of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year. In no event shall the sum of (i) plus (ii) exceed three and one-half percent (3.5%) or be less than zero percent (0%).

(II)

Is equal to the lesser of either the justice’s retirement allowance or the first twenty-five thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) of retirement allowance, such amount to be indexed annually in the same percentage as determined under subsection (e)(1)(B)(I) above.

The benefit adjustments provided by this subsection (e)(1)(B) shall be provided to all retirees entitled to receive a benefit adjustment as of June 30, 2012, under the law then in effect, and for all other retirees the benefit adjustments shall commence upon the third anniversary of the date of retirement or the date on which the retiree reaches his or her Social Security retirement age, whichever is later.

Except as provided in subsection (e)(3), the benefit adjustments under subsection (e)(1)(B) for any plan year shall be suspended in their entirety unless the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%) in which event the benefit adjustment will be reinstated for all justices for such plan year.

In determining whether a funding level under this subsection (e)(2) has been achieved, the actuary shall calculate the funding percentage after taking into account the reinstatement of any current or future benefit adjustment provided under this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (e)(2), in each fourth plan year commencing after June 30, 2012, commencing with the plan year ending June 30, 2016, and subsequently at intervals of four plan years: (i) A benefit adjustment shall be calculated and made in accordance with paragraph (e)(1)(B) above; and (ii) Effective for members and/or beneficiaries of members who retired on or before June 30, 2015, the dollar amount in subsection (e)(1)(B)(II) of twenty-five thousand eight hundred and fifty-five dollars ($25,855) shall be replaced with thirty-one thousand and twenty-six dollars ($31,026) until the funded ratio of the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island, the judicial retirement benefits trust, and the state police retirement benefits trust, calculated by the system’s actuary on an aggregate basis, exceeds eighty percent (80%).

Effective for members and or beneficiaries of members who have retired on or before July 1, 2015, a one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) shall be payable within sixty (60) days following the enactment of the legislation implementing this provision, and a second one-time stipend of five hundred dollars ($500) in the same month of the following year. These stipends shall be payable to all retired members or beneficiaries receiving a benefit as of the applicable payment date and shall not be considered cost of living adjustments under the prior provisions of this §

8-3-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1979, ch. 19, § 4; P.L. 1983, ch. 76, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 510, § 1; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 16, § 3; P.L. 2011, ch. 408, § 15; P.L. 2011, ch. 409, § 15; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 21, § 22; P.L. 2016, ch. 511, art. 1, § 5.